North Carolina, session 2025, SB829.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-4.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-4.4. Authority for reciprocity agreements; provisions; reciprocity standards.
(a) The Commissioner may enter into an agreement or arrangement for interstate or
intrastate operations with the duly authorized representatives of another jurisdiction, granting to
vehicles or to owners of vehicles which are properly registered or licensed in such jurisdiction
and for which evidence of compliance is supplied, benefits, privileges and exemptions from the
payment, wholly or partially, of any taxes, fees, or other charges imposed upon such vehicles or
owners with respect to the operation or ownership of such vehicles under the laws of this State.
Such an agreement or arrangement shall provide that vehicles properly registered or licensed in
this State when operated upon highways of such other jurisdiction shall receive exemptions,
benefits and privileges of a similar kind or to a similar degree as are extended to vehicles properly
registered or licensed in such jurisdiction when operated in this State. Each such agreement or
arrangement shall, in the judgment of the Commissioner, be in the best interest of this State and
the citizens thereof and shall be fair and equitable to this State and the citizens thereof, and all of
the same shall be determined on the basis and recognition of the benefits which accrue to the
economy of this State from the uninterrupted flow of commerce.
…."
SECTION 2. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles (Commissioner) shall evaluate
whether the Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles (DMV), and the Republic
of China (Taiwan) have established comparable knowledge, skill, and testing requirements for
drivers license applicants prior to the drivers license being issued. Provided that the DMV and
Taiwan have established comparable requirements and testing standards, no later than January 1,
2027, the Commissioner shall negotiate a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the
Ministry of Transportation and Communication of Taiwan related solely to the exchange of
noncommercial drivers licenses. No later than October 1, 2027, the Commissioner shall report to
the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the status of the memorandum of
understanding.
*S829-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles, the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to conduct a public awareness
campaign regarding the reciprocity authorized by this act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 829-First Edition